District of Columbia statutes.
8-2204

Wildlife control operator license.

(a)

The Department shall implement a licensing program for wildlife control operators. After the program is implemented, a wildlife control operator shall not engage in the business of providing wildlife control services unless the person is licensed to do so under this chapter.

(b)

The Director may deny a license if the Director has a reasonable belief that issuing a license to the applicant would pose a threat:

(1)

To public health or safety; or

(2)

Of cruelty to animals.

(c)

The Director shall deny a license if the applicant has been convicted of an offense involving wildlife or cruelty to animals within the previous 10 years.

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-289, § 5, 57 DCR 11499
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008, 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 8-2201 and § 8-2212.

Former § 8-2204 has been recodified as § 8-2034.

Applicability of D.C. Law 18-289: Section 13 of D.C. Law 18-289, codified as § 8-2212, provided that §§ 8-2204 through 8-2209 shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan. Section 8-2212 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008.